Utah statutes.
13-5-4.   Return of net earnings or surplus by cooperatives to members.
Nothing in this act shall prevent a cooperative association from returning to
its members, producers or consumers the whole, or any part of, the net
earnings or surplus resulting from its trading operations, in proportion to
their purchases or sales from, to or through the association.
